Utah statutes.
10-9a-514.   Manufactured homes.
(1)  For purposes of this section, a manufactured home is the same as defined
in Section 58-56-3, except that the manufactured home shall be attached to a
permanent foundation in accordance with plans providing for vertical loads,
uplift, and lateral forces and frost protection in compliance with the
applicable building code.  All appendages, including carports, garages,
storage buildings, additions, or alterations shall be built in compliance with
the applicable building code.
(2)  A manufactured home may not be excluded from any land use zone or area in
which a single-family residence would be permitted, provided the manufactured
home complies with all local land use ordinances, building codes, and any
restrictive covenants, applicable to a single family residence within that
zone or area.
(3)  A municipality may not:
(a)  adopt or enforce an ordinance or regulation that treats a proposed
development that includes manufactured homes differently than one that does
not include manufactured homes; or
(b)  reject a development plan based on the fact that the development is
expected to contain manufactured homes.
